California statutes. Public Resources Code
 Section 21080.5, an environmental impact report shall be completed within one year after receipt of the application. If the commission prepares a document or documents in the place of an environmental impact report or negative declaration under a regulatory program certified pursuant to Section 21080.5, any other public agency that must make a decision that is subject to the California Environmental Quality Act, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), on a site or related facility, shall use the document or documents prepared by the commission in the same manner as they would use an environmental impact report or negative declaration prepared by a lead agency.

(d) If the site and related facility specified in the application is proposed to be located in the coastal zone, the commission shall transmit a copy of the application to the California Coastal Commission for its review and comments.

(e) If the site and related facility specified in the application is proposed to be located in the Suisun Marsh or the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the commission shall transmit a copy of the application to the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission for its review and comments.

(f) Upon receipt of an application, the commission shall forward the application to local governmental agencies having land use and related jurisdiction in the area of the proposed site and related facility. Those local agencies shall review the application and submit comments on, among other things, the design of the facility, architectural and aesthetic features of the facility, access to highways, landscaping and grading, public use of lands in the area of the facility, and other appropriate aspects of the design, construction, or operation
 of the proposed site and related facility.

(g) Upon receipt of an application, the commission shall cause a summary of the application to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the site and related facilities, or any part thereof, designated in the application, is proposed to be located. The commission shall transmit a copy of the application to each federal and state agency having jurisdiction or special interest in matters pertinent to the proposed site and related facilities and to the Attorney General.

(h) Local and state agencies having jurisdiction or special interest in matters pertinent to the proposed site and related facilities shall provide their comments and recommendations on the project within 180 days of the date of filing of an application.

(i) The public advisor
 shall require that adequate notice is given to the public and that the procedures specified by this division are complied with.

(j) For any proposed site and related facility requiring a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the commission shall transmit a copy of the application to the Public Utilities Commission and request the comments and recommendations of the Public Utilities Commission on the economic, financial, rate, system reliability, and service implications of the proposed site and related facility. If the commission requires modification of the proposed facility, the commission shall consult with the Public Utilities Commission regarding the economic, financial, rate, system reliability, and service implications of those modifications.

(k) The commission shall transmit a copy of the application to any governmental agency not specifically mentioned in this
 act, but which it finds has any information or interest in the proposed site and related facilities, and shall invite the comments and recommendations of each agency. The commission shall request any relevant laws, ordinances, or regulations that an agency has promulgated or administered.

(l) An application for certification of any site and related facilities shall contain a listing of every federal agency from which any approval or authorization concerning the proposed site is required, specifying the approvals or authorizations obtained at the time of the application and the schedule for obtaining any approvals or authorizations pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 24.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25519.5.

(a) If the site and related facilities specified in the application are proposed to be located within 1,000 feet of a military installation, or lie within special use airspace or beneath a low-level flight path, as defined in Section 21098, the applicant shall inform the United States Department of Defense of the proposed project and that an application will be filed with the commission.

(b) If provided by the United States Department of Defense, the applicant shall include within the application a description of its consultation with the department, with regard to potential impacts upon national security, including potential impacts on the land, sea, and airspace identified by the United States
 Department of Defense and its impacted service components, for conducting operations and training, or for the research, development, testing, and evaluation of weapons, sensors, and tactics. If the information is provided after the application is filed, the applicant shall forward the information upon receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25520.

The application shall contain all of the following information and any other information that the commission by regulation may require:

(a) A detailed description of the design, construction, and operation of the proposed facility.

(b) Safety and reliability information, including, in addition to documentation previously provided pursuant to Section 25511, planned provisions for emergency operations and shutdowns.

(c) Available site information, including maps and descriptions of present and proposed development and, as appropriate, geological, aesthetic, ecological, seismic, water supply, population, and load center data, and justification for the particular site proposed.

(d) Any other information relating to the design, operation, and siting of the facility that the commission may specify.

(e) A description of the facility, the cost of the facility, the fuel to be used, the source of fuel, fuel cost, plant service life and capacity factor, and generating cost per kilowatthour.

(f) A description of any electric transmission lines, including the estimated cost of the proposed electric transmission line; a map in suitable scale of the proposed routing showing details of the rights-of-way in the vicinity of settled areas, parks, recreational areas, and scenic areas, and existing transmission lines within one mile of the proposed route; justification for the route, and a preliminary description of the effect of the proposed electric transmission line on the environment, ecology, and scenic, historic, and recreational values.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 581, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

25520.5.

(a) In reviewing an application for an additional facility at a potential multiple-facility site, the commission shall undertake a reconsideration of its prior determinations in the final report on the notice for the site issued pursuant to Section 25514, based on current conditions and other reasonable and feasible alternatives to the proposed facility.

(b) Within 180 days of the filing of the application for an additional facility at a potential multiple-facility site and after adequate public hearings, the commission shall issue its decision on the acceptability of the proposed facility based on the reconsideration specified in subdivision (a) of this section. A negative determination shall be the final decision of the commission on the application and subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 25531. An affirmative determination shall not be a final decision of the commission on the application.

(c) The decision of the commission on an application for an additional facility at a potential multiple-facility site receiving a favorable determination pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section shall be issued within 24 months after the filing of the application or at such later time as is mutually agreed upon by the commission and the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25521.

No earlier than 90 nor later than 240 days after the date of the filing of an application, the commission shall commence a public hearing or hearings on the application in Sacramento, San Francisco, Los Angeles, or San Diego, whichever city is nearest the proposed site. Additionally, the commission may hold a hearing or hearings in the county in which the proposed site and related facilities are to be located. The commission hearings shall provide a reasonable opportunity for the public and all parties to the proceeding to comment upon the application and the commission staff assessment and shall provide the equivalent opportunity for comment as required pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000). Consistent with the requirements of this section, the commission shall have the discretion to determine whether or not a hearing is to be conducted in a manner that requires formal examination of witnesses or that uses other similar adjudicatory procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 6.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25522.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 25520.5, within 18 months of the filing of an application for certification, or within 12 months if it is filed within one year of the commission’s approval of the notice of intent, or at any later time as is mutually agreed by the commission and the applicant, the commission shall issue a written decision as to the application.

(b) The commission shall determine, within 45 days after it receives the application, whether the application is complete. If the commission determines that the application is complete, the application shall be deemed filed for purposes of this section on the date that this determination is made. If the commission determines that the application is incomplete, the commission shall specify in writing those parts of the application which are incomplete and shall indicate the manner in which it can be made complete. If the applicant submits additional data to complete the application, the commission shall determine, within 30 days after receipt of that data, whether the data is sufficient to make the application complete. The application shall be deemed filed on the date when the commission determines the application is complete if the commission has adopted regulations specifying the informational requirements for a complete application, but if the commission has not adopted regulations, the application shall be deemed filed on the last date the commission receives any additional data that completes the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 335, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25523.

The commission shall prepare a written decision after the public hearing on an application, which includes all of the following:

(a) Specific provisions relating to the manner in which the proposed facility is to be designed, sited, and operated in order to protect environmental quality and assure public health and safety.

(b) In the case of a site to be located in the coastal zone, specific provisions to meet the objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) as may be specified in the report submitted by the California Coastal Commission pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30413, unless the commission specifically finds that the adoption of the provisions specified in the report would result in greater adverse effect on the environment or that the provisions proposed in the report would not be feasible.

(c) In the case of a site to be located in the Suisun Marsh or in the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, specific provisions to meet the requirements of Division 19 (commencing with Section 29000) of this code or Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code as may be specified in the report submitted by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 66645 of the Government Code, unless the commission specifically finds that the adoption of the provisions specified in the report would result in greater adverse effect on the environment or the provisions proposed in the report would not be feasible.

(d) (1) Findings regarding the conformity of the proposed site and related facilities with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 25216.3 and subdivision (d) of Section 25402, with public safety standards and the applicable air and water quality standards, and with other applicable local, regional, state, and federal standards, ordinances, or laws. If the commission finds that there is noncompliance with a state, local, or regional ordinance or regulation in the application, it shall consult and meet with the state, local, or regional governmental agency concerned to attempt to correct or eliminate the noncompliance. If the noncompliance cannot be corrected or eliminated, the commission shall inform the state, local, or regional governmental agency if it makes the findings required by Section 25525.

(2) The commission may not find that the proposed facility conforms with applicable air quality standards pursuant to paragraph (1) unless the applicable air pollution control district or air quality management district certifies, prior to the licensing of the project by the commission, that complete emissions offsets for the proposed facility have been identified and will be obtained by the applicant within the time required by the district’s rules or unless the applicable air pollution control district or air quality management district certifies that the applicant requires emissions offsets to be obtained prior to the commencement of operation consistent with Section 42314.3 of the Health and Safety Code and prior to commencement of the operation of the proposed facility. The commission shall require as a condition of certification that the applicant obtain any required emission offsets within the time required by the applicable district rules, consistent with any applicable federal and state laws and regulations, and prior to the commencement of the operation of the proposed facility.

(e) Provision for restoring the site as necessary to protect the environment, if the commission denies approval of the application.

(f) In the case of a site and related facility using resource recovery (waste-to-energy) technology, specific conditions requiring that the facility be monitored to ensure compliance with paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 42315 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) In the case of a facility, other than a resource recovery facility subject to subdivision (f), specific conditions requiring the facility to be monitored to ensure compliance with toxic air contaminant control measures adopted by an air pollution control district or air quality management district pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 39666 or Section 41700 of the Health and Safety Code, whether the measures were adopted before or after issuance of a determination of compliance by the district.

(h) A discussion of any public benefits from the project including, but not limited to, economic benefits, environmental benefits, and electricity reliability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25524.

(a) “Qualified applicant” for purposes of this section means an applicant for certification of an eligible renewable energy resource, as defined in the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code).

(b) The commission shall establish a process to allow a qualified applicant to elect to pay additional fees to be used by the commission to contract with a third party, or more than one third party, to assist commission staff in performing the analysis otherwise performed by commission staff in determining whether or not to issue a certification. The commission shall retain discretion as to when this option will
 be offered to a qualified applicant.

(c) The amount of the fees charged by the commission pursuant to this section shall be conditioned upon the qualified applicant agreeing to that amount and electing to proceed with the retention of the third party or parties pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) All fees paid by a qualified applicant shall be used exclusively for analysis of that applicant’s application for certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 4.   (AB 13 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25524.1.

(a) Except for the existing Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2 owned by Pacific Gas and Electric Company and San Onofre Units 2 and 3 owned by Southern California Edison Company and San Diego Gas and Electric Company, no nuclear fission thermal powerplant requiring the reprocessing of fuel rods, including any to which this chapter does not otherwise apply, excepting any having a vested right as defined in this section, shall be permitted land use in the state or, where applicable, certified by the commission until both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The commission finds that the United States through its authorized agency has identified and approved, and there exists a technology for the construction and operation of, nuclear fuel rod reprocessing plants.

(2) The commission has reported its findings and the reasons therefor pursuant to paragraph (1) to the Legislature. That report shall be assigned to the appropriate policy committees for review. The commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings unless within those 100 legislative days either house of the Legislature adopts by a majority vote of its members a resolution disaffirming the findings of the commission made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) A resolution of disaffirmance shall set forth the reasons for the action and shall provide, to the extent possible, guidance to the commission as to an appropriate method of bringing the commission’s findings into conformance with paragraph (1).

(4) If a disaffirming resolution is adopted, the commission shall reexamine its original findings consistent with matters raised in the resolution. On conclusion of its reexamination, the commission shall transmit its findings in writing, with the reasons therefor, to the Legislature.

(5) If the findings are that the conditions of paragraph (1) have been met, the commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings to the Legislature unless within those 100 legislative days both houses of the Legislature act by statute to declare the findings null and void and takes appropriate action.

(6) To allow sufficient time for the Legislature to act, the reports of findings of the commission shall be submitted to the Legislature at least six calendar months prior to the adjournment of the Legislature sine die.

(b) The commission shall further find on a case-by-case basis that facilities with adequate capacity to reprocess nuclear fuel rods from a certified nuclear facility or to store that fuel if that storage is approved by an authorized agency of the United States are in actual operation or will be in operation at the time that the nuclear facility requires reprocessing or storage; provided, however, that the storage of fuel is in an offsite location to the extent necessary to provide continuous onsite full core reserve storage capacity.

(c) The commission shall continue to receive and process notices of intention and applications for certification pursuant to this division, but shall not issue a decision pursuant to Section 25523 granting a certificate until the requirements of this section have been met. All other permits, licenses, approvals, or authorizations for the entry or use of the land, including orders of court, which may be required may be processed and granted by the governmental entity concerned, but construction work to install permanent equipment or structures shall not commence until the requirements of this section have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25524.2.

Except for the existing Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2 owned by Pacific Gas and Electric Company and San Onofre Units 2 and 3 owned by Southern California Edison Company and San Diego Gas and Electric Company, no nuclear fission thermal powerplant, including any to which this chapter does not otherwise apply, but excepting those exempted herein, shall be permitted land use in the state, or where applicable, be certified by the commission until both of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The commission finds that there has been developed and that the United States through its authorized agency has approved and there exists a demonstrated technology or means for the disposal of high-level nuclear waste.

(b) (1) The commission has reported its findings and the reasons therefor pursuant to paragraph (a) to the Legislature. That report shall be assigned to the appropriate policy committees for review. The commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings unless within those 100 legislative days either house of the Legislature adopts by a majority vote of its members a resolution disaffirming the findings of the commission made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A resolution of disaffirmance shall set forth the reasons for the action and shall provide, to the extent possible, guidance to the commission as to an appropriate method of bringing the commission’s findings into conformance with subdivision (a).

(3) If a disaffirming resolution is adopted, the commission shall reexamine its original findings consistent with matters raised in the resolution. On conclusion of its reexamination, the commission shall transmit its findings in writing, with the reasons therefor, to the Legislature.

(4) If the findings are that the conditions of subdivision (a) have been met, the commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings to the Legislature unless within those 100 legislative days both houses of the Legislature act by statute to declare the findings null and void and take appropriate action.

(5) To allow sufficient time for the Legislature to act, the reports of findings of the commission shall be submitted to the Legislature at least six calendar months prior to the adjournment of the Legislature sine die.

(c) As used in subdivision (a), “technology or means for the disposal of high-level nuclear waste” means a method for the permanent and terminal disposition of high-level nuclear waste. Nothing in this section requires that facilities for the application of that technology or means be available at the time that the commission makes its findings. That disposition of high-level nuclear waste does not preclude the possibility of an approved process for retrieval of the waste.

(d) The commission shall continue to receive and process notices of intention and applications for certification pursuant to this division but shall not issue a decision pursuant to Section 25523 granting a certificate until the requirements of this section have been met. All other permits, licenses, approvals, or authorizations for the entry or use of the land, including orders of court, which may be required may be processed and granted by the governmental entity concerned, but construction work to install permanent equipment or structures shall not commence until the requirements of this section have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25524.5.

The commission shall not certify any facility which adds generating capacity to a potential multiple-facility site in excess of the maximum allowable capacity established by the commission pursuant to Section 25516.5, unless the commission finds that exceeding the maximum allowable capacity will not increase adverse environmental impacts or create technological, seismic, or other difficulties beyond those already found acceptable in the commission’s findings on the notice for that site pursuant to Sections 25516 and 25516.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25525.

The commission may not certify a facility contained in the application when it finds, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 25523, that the facility does not conform with any applicable state, local, or regional standards, ordinances, or laws, unless the commission determines that the facility is required for public convenience and necessity and that there are not more prudent and feasible means of achieving public convenience and necessity. In making the determination, the commission shall consider the entire record of the proceeding, including, but not limited to, the impacts of the facility on the environment, consumer benefits, and electric system reliability. The commission may not make a finding in conflict with applicable federal law or regulation. The basis for these findings shall be reduced to writing and submitted as part of the record pursuant to Section 25523.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 733, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25526.

(a) The commission shall not approve as a site for a facility any location designated by the California Coastal Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30413, unless the California Coastal Commission first finds that such use is not inconsistent with the primary uses of such land and that there will be no substantial adverse environmental effects and unless the approval of any public agency having ownership or control of such land is obtained.

(b) The commission shall not approve as a site for a facility any location designated by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 66645 of the Government Code unless the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission first finds that such use is not inconsistent with the primary uses of such land and that there will be no substantial adverse environmental effects and unless the approval of any public agency having ownership or control of such land is obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

25527.

The following areas of the state shall not be approved as a site for a facility, unless the commission finds that such use is not inconsistent with the primary uses of such lands and that there will be no substantial adverse environmental effects and the approval of any public agency having ownership or control of such lands is obtained:

(a) State, regional, county and city parks; wilderness, scenic or natural reserves; areas for wildlife protection, recreation, historic preservation; or natural preservation areas in existence on the effective date of this division.

(b) Estuaries in an essentially natural and undeveloped state.

In considering applications for certification, the commission shall give the greatest consideration to the need for protecting areas of critical environmental concern, including, but not limited to, unique and irreplaceable scientific, scenic, and educational wildlife habitats; unique historical, archaelogical, and cultural sites; lands of hazardous concern; and areas under consideration by the state or the United States for wilderness, or wildlife and game reserves.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25528.

(a) The commission shall require, as a condition of certification of any site and related facility, that the applicant acquire, by grant or contract, the right to prohibit development of privately owned lands in the area of the proposed site which will result in population densities in excess of the maximum population densities which the commission determines, as to the factors considered by the commission pursuant to Section 25511, are necessary to protect public health and safety.

If the applicant is authorized to exercise the right of eminent domain under Article 7 (commencing with Section 610) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, the applicant may exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire such development rights as the commission requires be acquired.

(b) In the case of an application for a nuclear facility, the area and population density necessary to insure the public’s health and safety designated by the commission shall be that as determined from time to time by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, if the commission finds that such determination is sufficiently definitive for valid land use planning requirements.

(c) The commission shall waive the requirements of the acquisition of development rights by an applicant to the extent that the commission finds that existing governmental land use restrictions are of a type necessary and sufficient to guarantee the maintenance of population levels and land use development over the lifetime of the facility which will insure the public health and safety requirements set pursuant to this section.

(d) No change in governmental land use restrictions in such areas designated in subdivision (c) of this section by any government agency shall be effective until approved by the commission. Such approval shall certify that the change in land use restrictions is not in conflict with requirements provided for by this section.

(e) It is not the intent of the Legislature by the enactment of this section to take private property for public use without payment of just compensation in violation of the United States Constitution or the Constitution of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1114.)
-------------------------------------------

25529.

When a facility is proposed to be located in the coastal zone or any other area with recreational, scenic, or historic value, the commission shall require, as a condition of certification of any facility contained in the application, that an area be established for public use, as determined by the commission. Lands within such area shall be acquired and maintained by the applicant and shall be available for public access and use, subject to restrictions required for security and public safety. The applicant may dedicate such public use zone to any local agency agreeing to operate or maintain it for the benefit of the public. If no local agency agrees to operate or maintain the public use zone for the benefit of the public, the applicant may dedicate such zone to the state. The commission shall also require that any facility to be located along the coast or shoreline of any major body of water be set back from the shoreline to permit reasonable public use and to protect scenic and aesthetic values.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25530.

The commission may order a reconsideration of all or part of a decision or order on its own motion or on petition of any party.

Any such petition shall be filed within 30 days after adoption by the commission of a decision or order. The commission shall not order a reconsideration on its own motion more than 30 days after it has adopted a decison or order. The commission shall order or deny reconsideration on a petition therefor within 30 days after the petition is filed.

A decision or order may be reconsidered by the commission on the basis of all pertinent portions of the record together with such argument as the commission may permit, or the commission may hold a further hearing, after notice to all interested persons. A decision or order of the commission on reconsideration shall have the same force and effect as an original order or decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25531.

(a) The decisions of the commission on any application for certification of a site and related facility are subject to judicial review by the Supreme Court of California.

(b) No new or additional evidence may be introduced upon review and the cause shall be heard on the record of the commission as certified to by it. The review shall not be extended further than to determine whether the commission has regularly pursued its authority, including a determination of whether the order or decision under review violates any right of the petitioner under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution. The findings and conclusions of the commission on questions of fact are final and are not subject to review, except as provided in this article. These questions of fact shall include ultimate facts and the findings and conclusions of the commission. A report prepared by, or an approval of, the commission pursuant to Section 25510, 25514, 25516, or 25516.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 25520.5, shall not constitute a decision of the commission subject to judicial review.

(c) Subject to the right of judicial review of decisions of the commission, no court in this state has jurisdiction to hear or determine any case or controversy concerning any matter which was, or could have been, determined in a proceeding before the commission, or to stop or delay the construction or operation of any thermal powerplant except to enforce compliance with the provisions of a decision of the commission.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 1250.370 of the Code of Civil Procedure:

(1) If the commission requires, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25528, as a condition of certification of any site and related facility, that the applicant acquire development rights, that requirement conclusively establishes the matters referred to in Sections 1240.030 and 1240.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure in any eminent domain proceeding brought by the applicant to acquire the development rights.

(2) If the commission certifies any site and related facility, that certification conclusively establishes the matters referred to in Sections 1240.030 and 1240.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure in any eminent domain proceeding brought to acquire the site and related facility.

(e) No decision of the commission pursuant to Section 25516, 25522, or 25523 shall be found to mandate a specific supply plan for any utility as prohibited by Section 25323.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 8.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25532.

The commission shall establish a monitoring system to assure that any facility certified under this division is constructed and is operating in compliance with air and water quality, public health and safety, and other applicable regulations, guidelines, and conditions adopted or established by the commission or specified in the written decision on the application. In designing and operating the monitoring system, the commission shall seek the cooperation and assistance of the State Air Resources Board, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Health, and other state, regional, and local agencies which have an interest in environmental control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25534.

(a) The commission may, after one or more hearings, amend the conditions of, or revoke the certification for, any facility for any of the following reasons:

(1) Any material false statement set forth in the application, presented in proceedings of the commission, or included in supplemental documentation provided by the applicant.

(2) Any significant failure to comply with the terms or conditions of approval of the application, as specified by the commission in its written decision.

(3) A violation of this division or any regulation or order issued by the commission under this division.

(4) The owner of a project does not start construction of the project within 12 months after the date all permits necessary for the project become final and all administrative and judicial appeals have been resolved provided the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority notifies the commission that it is willing and able to construct the project pursuant to subdivision (g). The project owner may extend the 12-month period by 24 additional months pursuant to subdivision (f). This paragraph applies only to projects with a project permit application deemed complete by the commission after January 1, 2003.

(b) The commission may also administratively impose a civil penalty for a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a). Any civil penalty shall be imposed in accordance with Section 25534.1 and may not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per violation, except that the civil penalty may be increased by an amount not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per day for each day in which the violation occurs or persists, but the total of the per day penalties may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(c) A project owner shall commence construction of a project subject to the start-of-construction deadline provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) within 12 months after the project has been certified by the commission and after all accompanying project permits are final and administrative and judicial appeals have been completed. The project owner shall submit construction and commercial operation milestones to the commission within 30 days after project certification. Construction milestones shall require the start of construction within the 12-month period established by this subdivision. The commission shall approve milestones within 60 days after project certification. If the 30-day deadline to submit construction milestones to the commission is not met, the commission shall establish milestones for the project.

(d) The failure of the owner of a project subject to the start-of-construction deadline provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) to meet construction or commercial operation milestones, without a finding by the commission of good cause, shall be cause for revocation of certification or the imposition of other penalties by the commission.

(e) A finding by the commission that there is good cause for failure to meet the start-of-construction deadline required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) or any subsequent milestones of subdivision (c) shall be made if the commission determines that any of the following criteria are met:

(1) The change in any deadline or milestone does not change the established deadline or milestone for the start of commercial operation.

(2) The deadline or milestone is changed due to circumstances beyond the project owner’s control, including, but not limited to, administrative and legal appeals.
